sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
PFX A 0 nyanyomu/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyomu/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondi/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondi/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondi/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondo/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondo/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondo/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondoa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondochi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondohu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondoi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondoka/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondomu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondondi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondori/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondoru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondoti/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondotu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondou/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondova/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondowa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyondozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongo/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongo/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongo/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongoa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongochi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongohu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongoi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongoka/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongomu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongondi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongori/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongoru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongoti/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongotu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongou/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongova/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongowa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonguno/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonguno/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonguno/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunoa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunochi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunohu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunoi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunoka/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunomu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunondi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunori/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunoru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunoti/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunotu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunou/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunova/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunowa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyongunozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyono/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyono/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyono/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonoa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonochi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonohu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonoi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonoka/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonomu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonondi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonori/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonoru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonoti/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonotu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonou/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonova/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonowa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatso/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatso/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatso/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsoa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsochi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsohu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsoi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsoka/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsomu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsondi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsori/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsoru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsoti/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsotu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsou/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsova/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsowa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyonyatsozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyopa/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyopa/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyopa/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyori/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyori/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyori/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoru/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoru/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoru/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyorwu/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyorwu/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyorwu/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosi/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosi/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosi/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosia/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosichi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosidzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosihu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosihwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosii/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosika/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosikwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosimu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosindi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosiri/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosiru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosirwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyositi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyositu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyositwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosiu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosiva/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosiwa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosizvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikiro/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikiro/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikiro/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikiroa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirochi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirohu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikiroi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikiroka/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikiromu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirondi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirori/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikiroru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikiroti/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirotu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirou/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirova/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirowa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikirozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosviko/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosviko/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosviko/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikoa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikochi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikohu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikoi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikoka/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikomu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikondi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikori/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikoru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikoti/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikotu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikou/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikova/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikowa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosvikozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswero/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswero/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswero/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosweroa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerochi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerohu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosweroi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosweroka/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosweromu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerondi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerori/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosweroru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyosweroti/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerotu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerou/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerova/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerowa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoswerozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoti/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoti/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoti/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoto/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoto/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyoto/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotoa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotochi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotohu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotoi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotoka/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotomu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotondi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotori/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotoru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyototi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyototu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyototwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotou/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotova/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotowa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotu/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotu/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotu/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotwu/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotwu/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyotwu/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyou/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyou/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyou/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyova/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyova/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyova/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowa/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowa/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowa/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzo/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzo/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzo/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzoa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzochi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzodzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzohu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzohwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzoi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzoka/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzokwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzomu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzondi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzori/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzoru/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzorwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzoti/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzotu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzotwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzou/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzova/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzowa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyowanzozvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozai/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozai/D . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozai/F . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaia/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaichi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaidzi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaihu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaihwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaii/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaika/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaikwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaimu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaindi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozairi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozairu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozairwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaiti/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaitu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaitwu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaiu/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaiva/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaiwa/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozaizvi/H . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozo/C . 
PFX A 0 nyanyozo/D . 
