sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
asha/AVQ
bamura/AVQ
bata/AVQ
baya/AVQ
berekwa/AVQ
bhadharwa/AVQ
bharura/AVQ
bheukisa/AVQ
bhofora/AVQ
bhugudza/AVQ
bibidza/AVQ
binda/AVQ
birira/AVQ
boduna/AVQ
bongomora/AVQ
boya/AVQ
bufuka/AVQ
bungadza/AVQ
bururana/AVQ
bvanganyura/AVQ
bvebvemara/AVQ
bvisika/AVQ
bvonyongodza/AVQ
bvujudza/AVQ
bvumbunura/AVQ
bvunura/AVQ
bvuruvarisa/AVQ
bwandarika/AVQ
bwengezura/AVQ
bwinya/AVQ
chabwidza/AVQ
chadudza/AVQ
chakwatidza/AVQ
chapuka/AVQ
chechenya/AVQ
cheka/AVQ
chenama/AVQ
chenya/AVQ
cherudza/AVQ
chichinura/AVQ
chingura/AVQ
chiva/AVQ
chona/AVQ
chunjumara/AVQ
dadira/AVQ
dambuka/AVQ
dari/AVQ
dederesa/AVQ
demera/AVQ
denya/AVQ
deya/AVQ
dhanaira/AVQ
dherera/AVQ
dhinyanguka/AVQ
dhogodhedza/AVQ
dhudhumidza/AVQ
dhuura/AVQ
dimbidzira/AVQ
dishura/AVQ
domera/AVQ
dorika/AVQ
dukuta/AVQ
dunhura/AVQ
dwenga/AVQ
dyunga/AVQ
dzamisa/AVQ
dzedzereka/AVQ
dzidzisa/AVQ
dzimara/AVQ
dzinganisana/AVQ
dziva/AVQ
dzokoresa/AVQ
dzoresa/AVQ
dzungura/AVQ
dzvanhuka/AVQ
dzvokorera/AVQ
dzwinzwinya/AVQ
emeserwa/AVQ
eredza/AVQ
fachura/AVQ
fambirana/AVQ
fanzisa/AVQ
fashanudza/AVQ
feferudza/AVQ
femha/AVQ
fenura/AVQ
fetengwa/AVQ
finhuka/AVQ
fita/AVQ
fomora/AVQ
fora/AVQ
fovovoka/AVQ
fufumura/AVQ
fuhura/AVQ
fukunyura/AVQ
fumuka/AVQ
fundunyura/AVQ
funuka/AVQ
furatidzwa/AVQ
furura/AVQ
futuma/AVQ
fuzhura/AVQ
gadzika/AVQ
gahanira/AVQ
gangaradza/AVQ
garingidza/AVQ
geda-geda/AVQ
girebha/AVQ
gogodza-gogodza/AVQ
gomezeka/AVQ
gonya/AVQ
gubhura/AVQ
guguvara/AVQ
gumbatirira/AVQ
gumirwa/AVQ
gupa/AVQ
guruvha/AVQ
guwa/AVQ
gwajanura/AVQ
gwata/AVQ
gwederedza/AVQ
gweta/AVQ
gwiza/AVQ
hechura/AVQ
honya/AVQ
hwa/AVQ
hwehwedzera/AVQ
hwiridza/AVQ
ingidza/AVQ
itswa/AVQ
jakaira/AVQ
jejebura/AVQ
jinyura/AVQ
jongoroka/AVQ
kacha/AVQ
kakama/AVQ
kakatyura/AVQ
kamwa/AVQ
kangamwa/AVQ
kanhamara/AVQ
kapaira/AVQ
karavheta/AVQ
kasva/AVQ
kaurira/AVQ
kekeredza/AVQ
kindingidza/AVQ
kocha/AVQ
kodzekwa/AVQ
kokonoka/AVQ
komberedza/AVQ
kondonoka/AVQ
konza/AVQ
koresa/AVQ
koshesa/AVQ
kotosa/AVQ
kozomora/AVQ
kuhumura/AVQ
kumanisa/AVQ
kumuka/AVQ
kungurutsa/AVQ
kuputsa/AVQ
kurura/AVQ
kutswira/AVQ
kuya/AVQ
kwachura/AVQ
kwamira/AVQ
kwanyanuka/AVQ
kwasva/AVQ
kwazisa/AVQ
kwenenzvera/AVQ
kwesha/AVQ
kwezvaira/AVQ
kwira/AVQ
makana/AVQ
manikidza/AVQ
maranza/AVQ
mberereka/AVQ
mbumurira/AVQ
mbwodoka/AVQ
menyukira/AVQ
mhara/AVQ
mimina/AVQ
mirudza/AVQ
monera/AVQ
motseka/AVQ
musana/AVQ
mwa/AVQ
mwararidza/AVQ
mwenha/AVQ
n'adza/AVQ
namanuka/AVQ
n'an'aura/AVQ
n'anyaira/AVQ
nava/AVQ
ndenga-ndenga/AVQ
ndimura/AVQ
nekarira/AVQ
ngaima/AVQ
ngongodza/AVQ
nguzvudza/AVQ
nhanhiridza/AVQ
nina/AVQ
njekenja/AVQ
nona/AVQ
n'wa/AVQ
nyan'anya/AVQ
nyapura/AVQ
nyenamira/AVQ
nyevenudza/AVQ
nyokorana/AVQ
nyungurusa/AVQ
nzi/AVQ
nzvandama/AVQ
odzeka/AVQ
onyana/AVQ
pafarika/AVQ
pambuka/AVQ
panganuka/AVQ
paramandutsa/AVQ
patidza/AVQ
pedzeredza/AVQ
peperedza/AVQ
petanidza/AVQ
pfatsura/AVQ
pfigira/AVQ
pfondera/AVQ
pfukura/AVQ
pfundumwadza/AVQ
pfurikidza/AVQ
pidigura/AVQ
pinga/AVQ
pirikira/AVQ
pofoka/AVQ
poredzera/AVQ
pudunuka/AVQ
punyaira/AVQ
pururuka/AVQ
pwapwata/AVQ
rabanuka/AVQ
rambanyudza/AVQ
raramira/AVQ
reba/AVQ
rembuka-rembuka/AVQ
reverera/AVQ
rimbinyura/AVQ
riwainda/AVQ
roposha/AVQ
rubvunyura/AVQ
runza/AVQ
sadaguka/AVQ
sanda/AVQ
sasika/AVQ
sendura/AVQ
sevhisa/AVQ
shandisira/AVQ
shaudha/AVQ
shikishira/AVQ
shokorana/AVQ
shoshowa/AVQ
shusha/AVQ
sikiza/AVQ
sitirecha/AVQ
soropodza/AVQ
sunda/AVQ
surukirwa/AVQ
svasvamhira/AVQ
sveverera/AVQ
svitsana/AVQ
svototsa/AVQ
swenzedza/AVQ
takama/AVQ
tamuka/AVQ
tangurwi/AVQ
taramuka/AVQ
tatanutsa/AVQ
tedzemuka/AVQ
tekuka/AVQ
tengama/AVQ
tereka/AVQ
teura/AVQ
tikishudza/AVQ
tira/AVQ
togoka/AVQ
torera/AVQ
tsamwisa/AVQ
tsaya/AVQ
tseura/AVQ
tsinatira/AVQ
tsiuka/AVQ
tsotsodza/AVQ
tsunzira/AVQ
tsvata/AVQ
tsvidigika/AVQ
tsvukuruka/AVQ
tukirira/AVQ
tungamidza/AVQ
turuka/AVQ
tuzura/AVQ
uchira/AVQ
undura/AVQ
urutsa/AVQ
vandira/AVQ
vavisa/AVQ
vhainisa/AVQ
vhengedza/AVQ
vhiringa-vhiringa/AVQ
vhumburutsa/AVQ
vhuta/AVQ
virisa/AVQ
wanda/AVQ
wawira/AVQ
wonerera/AVQ
yangamara/AVQ
yeuka/AVQ
zata/AVQ
zhamura/AVQ
zhwaura/AVQ
zorora/AVQ
zvambuka/AVQ
zvinyararira/AVQ
